Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
CONTRACTS AND INTERVIEWS

23-16-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that dishonest or unscrupulous practices by athlete agents who solicit representation of student athletes can cause significant harm to student athletes and to the institutions of higher education for which they play. It is the general assembly's intent to protect the interests of student athletes and institutions of higher education by limiting the contacts between athlete agents and student athletes and by setting requirements for contracts entered into between athlete agents and student athletes.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1487, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-102. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agent contract" means any contract or agreement in which a student athlete authorizes or empowers, or agrees to authorize or empower at some later date, an athlete agent to negotiate or solicit any professional sport services contract or marketing endorsement contract on behalf of the student athlete regardless of whether the athlete agent is entitled to compensation under the contract or agreement.

"Athlete agent" means a person who, directly or indirectly, recruits or solicits a student athlete to enter into an agent contract, or who, for any type of financial gain, procures, offers, promises, or attempts to obtain employment or promotional fees or benefits for a student athlete with a professional sports team or as a professional athlete or with any promoter who markets or attempts to market the student athlete's athletic ability or athletic reputation.

Repealed.

"Governing board" means the governing body of a state-supported institution of higher education.

"Institution" means any state-supported institution of higher education operating in this state and any nonpublic institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-3.7-102 (3), operating in this state.

"Student athlete" means any individual who is enrolled as a student at an institution and has either submitted a written letter of intent to or is eligible to and does participate in any intercollegiate sporting event, contest, exhibition, or program.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1487, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP amended, p. 1015, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3) repealed, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2080, § 53, effective August 11.

23-16-103. Contact with student athletes prohibited. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1488, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1015, § 3, effective July 1.

23-16-104. Agent contracts - contents - notice - termination.

In addition to the requirements specified in section

23-16-209

for contracts with athlete agents, any agent contract entered into between an athlete agent and a student athlete shall also include:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1015, § 4, effective July 1, 2008.)

Any guarantees provided by the athlete agent to the student athlete;

In addition to the warning required to be given to the student athlete as specified in section

23-16-209

(c), the following statement in at least ten-point type that is bold-faced, capitalized, underlined, or otherwise conspicuously set out from surrounding written material:

DO NOT SIGN THIS CONTRACT UNTIL YOU HAVE READ IT OR IF IT CONTAINS BLANK SPACES. DO NOT SIGN THIS CONTRACT IF IT DOES NOT SPECIFY ALL OF THE GUARANTEES MADE TO YOU BY THE ATHLETE AGENT. IF YOU DECIDE THAT YOU DO NOT WISH TO PURCHASE THE SERVICES OF THE ATHLETE AGENT, YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT BY NOTIFYING THE ATHLETE AGENT IN WRITING OF YOUR DESIRE TO CANCEL THE CONTRACT WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT.

to (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1015, § 4, effective July 1, 2008.)

WARNING TO STUDENT ATHLETE:

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1488, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1015, § 4, effective July 1.

23-16-105. Exceptions - written materials - student-initiated contacts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1490, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1016, § 5, effective July 1.

23-16-106. Athlete agent interviews - scheduling - rules.

Each institution that participates in intercollegiate athletics may sponsor on-campus athlete agent interviews at which an athlete agent may interview student athletes to discuss the athlete agent's representation of the student athletes in the marketing of the student athletes' athletic ability or reputation. The governing board of the institution or the institution may adopt rules with regard to the scheduling of interview periods, the duration of each interview period, and locations on campus where interviews may be conducted. Nothing in this section prohibits a student athlete and an athlete advisor, as defined in section 23-16-301 (1)(b), from meeting at a time and place other than an on-campus athlete agent interview that is sponsored by an institution pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1490, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-123), ch. 35, p. 117, § 3, effective July 1, 2021 (See editor's note.).

Editor's note:

Section 1 of House Bill 21-1328 changed the effective date of this section, as amended in Senate Bill 20-123, from January 1, 2023, to July 1, 2021. (See L. 2021, p. 2393.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20-123, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

23-16-107. Compliance coordinator - duties.

Each institution or governing board shall designate an individual to serve as compliance coordinator for the institution or for each institution under the governing board's management. The compliance coordinator shall ensure the compliance of the institution and its athletes and students with the provisions of this part 1 and the rules adopted by the governing board or institution.

If an institution chooses to sponsor on-campus athlete agent interviews as provided in section 23-16-106, the compliance coordinator shall organize the athlete interview schedule. The compliance coordinator shall provide appropriate public notice of the interview period at least thirty days before the date the interview period is scheduled to begin. On receipt of a written request, the compliance coordinator shall provide an athlete agent with a copy of the rules adopted by the governing board or institution pursuant to section 23-16-106.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1490, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1017, § 6, effective July 1.

23-16-108. Violations - penalties - civil suit. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added, p. 1490, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1017, § 7, effective July 1.